North Dakota, session 69, HB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-02-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
20.1-02-17. Conditional assent to federal aid projects - Proceeds from license fees
and application to be used for administration of department.
1. North Dakota assents to the Act of Congress entitled "An Act to provide that the United
States shall aid the states in wildlife restoration projects and for other purposes" [Pub.
L. 75-415; 50 Stat. 917; 16 U.S.C. 669 et seq.], and the Act of Congress entitled "An
Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and
management projects, and for other purposes" [Pub. L. 81-681; 64 Stat. 430; 16
U.S.C. 777 et seq.] subject to the conditions of section 20.1-02-17.1. The director may
conduct and establish cooperative wildlife and fish restoration projects as defined in
these Acts, in compliance with the Acts and with rules adopted by the federal agency
administering these Acts.
2. Hunting and fishing license fees and application fees assessed under section
20.1-03-12.2 may only be used only for departmental programs and administration
unrelated to chronic wasting disease.
Page No. 1 25.0460.01000